Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1826
Authority; rules and regulations for use of project; designate agent.

The authority may establish rules and regulations for the use of a project or any portion thereof and designate an elementary or secondary school as its agent to establish rules and regulations for the use of a project undertaken by such elementary or secondary school.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 26.